Utah statutes.
41-1a-516.   Annual renewal of titles unnecessary -- Superseded certificates
invalid.
(1)  Certificates of title need not be renewed annually but shall remain valid
until canceled by the division for cause or upon a transfer of any interest
shown on the certificate.
(2)  A certificate of title is invalid when superseded by a duplicate
certificate issued under Section 41-1a-518 or when the certificate has been
superseded by a certificate issued by another state or country.
